Massachusetts, session 194th, H3941.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1A of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The department shall not be required to provide notice to a school district before visiting
a school located in the district.
of 1